ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#هم	
SFX	K7	Y	4	
SFX	K7	ى	ونه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	K7	0	ونه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ى]
SFX	K7	ى	وه/EdEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	K7	0	وه/EdEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ى]
	
#هن	
SFX	K8	Y	2	
SFX	K8	ى	ينه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	K8	0	نه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ى]
	
	
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	L1	Y	9	
SFX	L1	ي	يه/FaFeFiFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	ي	ه/FaFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	0	ه/FaFeFiFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L1	ي	يه/FbFfFjFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	ي	ه/FbFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	0	ه/FbFfFjFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L1	ي	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	ي	ه/FcFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L1	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#أنت-أنتما-أنتم	
SFX	L2	Y	12	
SFX	L2	ي	ينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	ينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L2	ي	يه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	يه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L2	ي	يانه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	انه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L2	ي	ياه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	اه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L2	ي	ونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	ونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L2	ي	وه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L2	0	وه/FcFoFsh0X0	[^ي]
	
#أنتن	
SFX	L3	Y	2	
SFX	L3	ي	ينه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	L3	0	نه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#هو	
SFX	L4	Y	3	
SFX	L4	ي	يه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L4	ي	ه/FdFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L4	0	ه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#هي	
SFX	L5	Y	3	
SFX	L5	ي	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L5	ي	ه/FcFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L5	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#هما	
SFX	L6	Y	8	
SFX	L6	ي	يانه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L6	0	انه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L6	ي	ياه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L6	0	اه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L6	ي	يانه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L6	0	انه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L6	ي	ياه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L6	0	اه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#هم	
SFX	L7	Y	4	
SFX	L7	ي	ونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L7	0	ونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
SFX	L7	ي	وه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L7	0	وه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
	
#هن	
SFX	L8	Y	2	
SFX	L8	ي	ينه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	L8	0	نه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]
	
	
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	M1	Y	27	
SFX	M1	أ	ئه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M1	اء	يئه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	اء	ئه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	0	ه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	أى	ئيه/BaBeBiBmBqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	أى	ئه/BaBqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	0	ه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M1	أ	ئه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M1	اء	يئه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	اء	ئه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	0	ه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	أى	ئيه/BbBfBjBnBrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	أى	ئه/BbBrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	0	ه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M1	أ	ئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M1	اء	يئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	اء	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M1	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M1	أى	ئيه/BcBgBkBoBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	أى	ئه/BcBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M1	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#أنت-أنتما-أنتم	
SFX	M2	Y	32	
SFX	M2	أ	ئينه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئينه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	ينه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ئينه/BcBgBkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	ينه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M2	أ	ئيه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئيه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	يه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ئيه/BcBoBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	يه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M2	أ	ئانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	انه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	0	يانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ئيانه/BcBgBkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	انه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M2	أ	ئاه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئاه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	اه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	0	ياه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ئياه/BcBoBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	اه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M2	أ	ئونه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئونه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	ونه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ؤونه/BcBgBkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	ونه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M2	أ	ئوه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M2	اء	يئوه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M2	0	وه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M2	أى	ؤوه/BcBoBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M2	0	وه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#أنتن	
SFX	M3	Y	5	
SFX	M3	أ	ئنه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	M3	اء	ئنه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	M3	0	ينه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	M3	أى	ئينه/BcBgBkBoBsh0b0c0i0X0	أى
SFX	M3	0	نه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#هو	
SFX	M4	Y	9	
SFX	M4	أ	ئه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M4	اء	يئه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M4	اء	ئه/AdAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M4	0	ه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M4	0	اه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M4	0	اه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M4	أى	ئيه/BdBhBlBpBth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M4	أى	ئه/BdBth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M4	0	ه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#هي	
SFX	M5	Y	9	
SFX	M5	أ	ئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M5	اء	يئه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M5	اء	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M5	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M5	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M5	0	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M5	أى	ئيه/BcBgBkBoBsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M5	أى	ئه/BcBsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M5	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#هما	
SFX	M6	Y	24	
SFX	M6	أ	ئانه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M6	اء	يئانه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M6	0	انه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	0	يانه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	أى	ئيانه/BdBhBlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M6	0	انه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M6	أ	ئاه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M6	اء	يئاه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M6	0	اه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	0	ياه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	أى	ئياه/BdBpBth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M6	0	اه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M6	أ	ئانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M6	اء	يئانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M6	0	انه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	0	يانه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	أى	ئيانه/BcBgBkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M6	0	انه/AcAgAkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M6	أ	ئاه/AcAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M6	اء	يئاه/AcAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M6	0	اه/AcAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	0	ياه/AcAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M6	أى	ئياه/BcBoBsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M6	0	اه/AcAoAsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#هم	
SFX	M7	Y	10	
SFX	M7	أ	ئونه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M7	اء	يئونه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M7	0	ونه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M7	أى	ؤونه/BdBhBlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M7	0	ونه/AdAhAlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
SFX	M7	أ	ئوه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M7	اء	يئوه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M7	0	وه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M7	أى	ؤوه/BdBpBth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M7	0	وه/AdApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]
	
#هن	
SFX	M8	Y	5	
SFX	M8	أ	ئنه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	M8	اء	ئنه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	M8	0	ينه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	M8	أى	ئينه/BdBhBlBpBth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أى
SFX	M8	0	نه/AdAhAlApAth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أىءي]

	

############لواحق#الماضي-عاقل####################
	

#-أنتن-أنتم-أنتما-أنتِ-أنتَ-نحن-أنا	
	
