ext/spell/ar.dic
أتكأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
اجتشأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أخطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أدفأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أردأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أساء/o?o2o3o4o5o6o$s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O?O2O3O4O5O6O$Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
استبطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
استقرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
استناء/o?o2o3o4o5o6o$s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O?O2O3O4O5O6O$Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أضاء/o?o2o3o4o5o6o$s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O?O2O3O4O5O6O$Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أظمأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أفاء/o?o2o3o4o5o6o$s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O?O2O3O4O5O6O$Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أقرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أكمأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أناء/o?o2o3o4o5o6o$s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O?O2O3O4O5O6O$Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أنبأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أنشأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أهدأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أهرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
أوطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
بأبأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
باطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
برأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
بطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
بوأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
جاء/s1t2t3t4t5t6s7o1s2s3s4s5s6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8S1T2T3T4T5T6S7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
جرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
جزأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
خطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
دارأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
دفأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
شيأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
ظمأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
فاجأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
قاء/s1t2t3t4t5t6s7o1s2s3s4s5s6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8S1T2T3T4T5T6S7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
قارأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
كافأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
لجأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
مرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
نشأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
هنأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
واضأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
وضأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
ولي/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6l1l2l3l4l5l6l7l8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6L1L2L3L4L5L6L7L8
ناوأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7Y1Y2Y3M1M2M3M4M5M6M7M8
